Missouri, session 2026, HB2325.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 558, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 558.023, to read as follows:
558.023. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Concealment", actions taken to hide a person's identity that would prevent
ordinary witnesses or surveillance from recognizing the person;
(2) "Intent to conceal", a person knowingly and purposefully taking action to
avoid identification while committing an offense.
2. If a person is convicted of a misdemeanor or felony and the state proves
beyond a reasonable doubt that the person wore a mask, hood, disguise, or other
clothing or a device with the intent to conceal the person's identity for the purpose of
committing the misdemeanor or felony, the court may impose an enhanced sentence.
3. (1) The enhanced sentence may increase the class of the offense by up to one
class higher than the underlying misdemeanor or felony for which the person was
convicted.
(2) The court shall consider the circumstances of the offense and the person's
prior record when deciding whether an enhancement is appropriate.
4. The provisions of this section shall apply only to misdemeanors and felonies
involving theft, assault, or property damage exceeding five hundred dollars.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2325 2
5. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons wearing face or body
coverings for legitimate religious, medical, or occupational purposes, or in
circumstances where concealment was incidental and not intended to aid in
committing the offense.
6. (1) Evidence of intentional concealment may be considered by the court at
sentencing for the underlying offense, without requiring a separate jury determination.
(2) The court may consider such evidence in deciding the appropriate sentence
within the statutory limits.
✔